lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Comp_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Pass_Pres_Super_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:Indic_Pres_III_short_deprecated
AM is:Optative_III
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_I
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_II
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_I
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_I_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_II
AM is:Indic_Past_Pl_II_short
AM is:Indic_Past_III
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_I_short
AM is:Indic_Past_Sg_II_short
AM is:Indic_Past_III_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Neut
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Nom_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Voc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Nom_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Voc_rare
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Loc_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Voc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Nom
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Gen
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Dat_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Acc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Inst_short
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Loc
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Voc
AM is:Gerund_Past
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Sg_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Pl_Il
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Fem_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Masc_Dual
AM is:Part_Act_Past_Def_Fem_Dual
AM is:none
AM is:Super_short_rare
AM is:rare
AM is:Super_long
AM is:short

SFX 1 Y 4
SFX 1 as as . 38
SFX 1 as o . 39
SFX 1 ai ai . 40
SFX 1 ai ų . 41

SFX 3 Y 10
SFX 3 as ui . 42
SFX 3 as ą . 43
SFX 3 as u . 44
SFX 3 as e . 45
SFX 3 ai ams . 46
SFX 3 ai am . 47
SFX 3 ai us . 48
SFX 3 ai ais . 49
SFX 3 ai uose . 50
SFX 3 ai uos . 51

SFX 7 Y 1
SFX 7 as e . 52

SFX 8 Y 3
SFX 8 ukas uk . 52
SFX 8 okas oke . 52
SFX 8 okas ok . 53

SFX 11 Y 1
SFX 11 as ai . 52

SFX 12 Y 2
SFX 12 as an . 54
SFX 12 ai uosna . 55

SFX 13 Y 1
SFX 13 as u . 56

SFX 14 Y 2
SFX 14 as ai . 40
SFX 14 as ų . 41

SFX 16 Y 6
SFX 16 as ams . 46
SFX 16 as am . 47
SFX 16 as us . 48
SFX 16 as ais . 49
SFX 16 as uose . 50
SFX 16 as uos . 51

SFX 22 Y 1
SFX 22 as ai . 57

SFX 23 Y 1
SFX 23 as uosna . 55

SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 ai ai . 57

SFX 34 Y 2
SFX 34 ai as . 58
SFX 34 ai o . 59

SFX 36 Y 4
SFX 36 ai ui . 60
SFX 36 ai ą . 61
SFX 36 ai u . 62
SFX 36 ai e . 63

SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 ai e . 64

SFX 41 Y 3
SFX 41 ukai uk . 64
SFX 41 okai oke . 64
SFX 41 okai ok . 65

SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 ai an . 66

SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 ai u . 67

SFX 46 Y 4
SFX 46 as as . 68
SFX 46 as o . 69
SFX 46 ai ai . 70
SFX 46 ai ų . 71

SFX 48 Y 10
SFX 48 as ui . 72
SFX 48 as ą . 73
SFX 48 as u . 74
SFX 48 as e . 75
SFX 48 ai ams . 76
SFX 48 ai am . 77
SFX 48 ai us . 78
SFX 48 ai ais . 79
SFX 48 ai uose . 80
SFX 48 ai uos . 81

SFX 52 Y 2
SFX 52 as e . 82
SFX 52 ai ai . 83

SFX 53 Y 2
SFX 53 as an . 84
SFX 53 ai uosna . 85

SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 as u . 86

SFX 55 Y 2
SFX 55 as ai . 70
SFX 55 as ų . 71

SFX 57 Y 6
SFX 57 as ams . 76
SFX 57 as am . 77
SFX 57 as us . 78
SFX 57 as ais . 79
SFX 57 as uose . 80
SFX 57 as uos . 81

SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 as ai . 83

SFX 64 Y 1
SFX 64 as uosna . 85

SFX 75 Y 2
SFX 75 ai ai . 40
SFX 75 ai ų . 41

SFX 77 Y 6
SFX 77 ai ams . 46
SFX 77 ai am . 47
SFX 77 ai us . 48
SFX 77 ai ais . 49
SFX 77 ai uose . 50
SFX 77 ai uos . 51

SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 ai ai . 57

SFX 84 Y 1
SFX 84 ai uosna . 55

SFX 85 Y 4
SFX 85 as as . 38
SFX 85 as o . 39
SFX 85 ai ai . 40
SFX 85 ai ų . 41

SFX 87 Y 16
SFX 87 as ui . 42
SFX 87 as ą . 43
SFX 87 as u . 44
SFX 87 ias yje [^č]ias 45
SFX 87 čias tyje čias 45
SFX 87 ias y [^č]ias 87
SFX 87 ias yj [^č]ias 88
SFX 87 čias ty čias 87
SFX 87 as uje jas 45
SFX 87 as uj jas 87
SFX 87 ai ams . 46
SFX 87 ai am . 47
SFX 87 ai us . 48
SFX 87 ai ais . 49
SFX 87 ai uose . 50
SFX 87 ai uos . 51

SFX 96 Y 2
SFX 96 as yje jas 45
SFX 96 as y jas 87

SFX 99 Y 4
SFX 99 as au jas 52
SFX 99 as y [^č]ias 52
SFX 99 čias ty [^š]čias 52
SFX 99 čias ti ščias 52

SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 ias i . 52

SFX 104 Y 3
SFX 104 ias ie . 52
SFX 104 ias iau . 52
SFX 104 ias ie . 52

SFX 107 Y 3
SFX 107 as an . 54
SFX 107 as uosna . 55
SFX 107 ai uosna . 55

SFX 108 Y 1
SFX 108 as in jas 54

SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 ias in . 54

SFX 110 Y 1
SFX 110 ias in . 54

SFX 111 Y 1
SFX 111 as u . 56

SFX 112 Y 2
SFX 112 as ai . 40
SFX 112 as ų . 41

SFX 114 Y 6
SFX 114 as ams . 46
SFX 114 as am . 47
SFX 114 as us . 48
SFX 114 as ais . 49
SFX 114 as uose . 50
SFX 114 as uos . 51

SFX 120 Y 1
SFX 120 as ai . 57

SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 ai ai . 57

SFX 132 Y 2
SFX 132 ai as . 58
SFX 132 ai o . 59

SFX 134 Y 9
SFX 134 ai ui . 60
SFX 134 ai ą . 61
SFX 134 ai u . 62
SFX 134 iai yje [^č]iai 63
SFX 134 čiai tyje čiai 63
SFX 134 iai y [^č]iai 88
SFX 134 čiai ty čiai 88
SFX 134 ai uje jai 63
SFX 134 ai uj jai 88

SFX 143 Y 4
SFX 143 ai au jai 64
SFX 143 ai y [^č]iai 64
SFX 143 čiai ty [^š]čiai 64
SFX 143 čiai ti ščiai 64

SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 ai an . 66

SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 ai u . 67

SFX 149 Y 6
SFX 149 is is . 38
SFX 149 ys ys . 38
SFX 149 is io . 39
SFX 149 ys io . 39
SFX 149 ai ai . 40
SFX 149 ai ų . 41

SFX 153 Y 16
SFX 153 is iui . 42
SFX 153 ys iui . 42
SFX 153 is į . 43
SFX 153 ys į . 43
SFX 153 is iu . 44
SFX 153 ys iu . 44
SFX 153 is yje . 45
SFX 153 ys yje . 45
SFX 153 is y . 87
SFX 153 ys y . 87
SFX 153 ai ams . 46
SFX 153 ai am . 47
SFX 153 ai us . 48
SFX 153 ai ais . 49
SFX 153 ai uose . 50
SFX 153 ai uos . 51

SFX 163 Y 5
SFX 163 is i . 52
SFX 163 ys y . 52
SFX 163 is au brolis 52
SFX 163 is iau dievulėlis 52
SFX 163 ai ai . 57

SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 is 0 . 53

SFX 168 Y 3
SFX 168 is in . 54
SFX 168 ys in . 54
SFX 168 ai uosna . 55

AF 1,3,11,32,30001 # 1
AF 1,3,11,14,16,22,32,30001 # 7
AF 1,3,7,12,14,16,22,23,32,30001 # 8
AF 1,3,12,14,16,23,30001 # 10
AF 75,77,83,30001 # 11
AF 149,153,163,172,176,188,30001 # 12
AF 149,153,163,30001 # 18
AF 1,3,7,12,32,30001 # 26
AF 85,87,99,107,112,114,120,130,30001 # 29
AF 1,3,7,32,30001 # 32
AF 1,3,7,12,14,16,22,23,32,34,36,40,44,30001 # 33
AF 1,3,8,12,14,16,22,23,32,30001 # 36
AF 149,153,163,168,172,176,188,190,30001 # 45
AF 85,87,99,107,112,114,120,130,132,134,143,147,30001 # 50
AF 1,3,8,11,32,30001 # 60
AF 149,153,163,167,172,176,188,30001 # 63
AF 149,153,163,167,168,172,176,188,190,30001 # 69
AF 75,77,83,84,30001 # 122
AF 1,3,7,12,13,14,16,22,23,32,30001 # 318
AF 1,3,8,12,14,16,22,23,32,34,36,41,44,30001 # 324
AF 85,87,103,107,109,112,114,120,130,30001 # 336
AF 85,87,99,107,130,30001 # 355
AF 85,87,96,99,107,108,112,114,120,130,30001 # 391
AF 46,48,52,53,55,57,63,64,30001 # 395
AF 85,87,104,107,110,112,114,120,130,30001 # 515
