lt_LT.dic
Biržai/122	7
Blumfonteinas/32	7
bluzonas/8	5
chaosėlis/69	5
danajai/50	5
Daugirdas/7	6
daugžodžiavimas/8	5
devynetas/8	5
dirbtinumas/8	5
Dolubovskis/18	6
Domanskis/12	6
draugas/318	5
Drobulis/12	6
Dubiševas/7	6
dulkinimas/8	5
eilėraštukas/36	5
elnias/336	5
etamivanas/10	5
filistinas/8	5
Filonovas/7	6
galeatai/33	5
galelis/69	5
galindai/33	5
garbinimas/8	5
Gariūnai/11	7
Gasčiūnai/11	7
Genčai/11	7
gėrėjas/29	5
harmonizuotojas/29	5
himenėjas/355	5
hiperborėjai/50	5
iešmelis/69	5
interpeliuotojas/29	5
interpretuotojas/29	5
išbyrėjimas/8	5
išdalinimas/8	5
Jansas/7	6
kabestanas/8	5
Kalderonas/1	6
kareivis/45	5
kariškis/45	5
Kavolėlis/63	6
Kazlai/122	7
kedukai/324	5
keliamumas/8	5
kraujas/391	5
krumpliaratukas/36	5
Kutaliai/11	7
Kuturiai/11	7
kvantometras/8	5
latakas/8	5
Latvėnas/7	6
Lašai/11	7
liurbis/45	5
luditai/33	5
magnetofonas/8	5
majai/50	5
Maxas/1	4
mašaliukai/324	5
megakariocitai/33	5
Merkys/12	6
milžinas/318	5
nedraugas/395	5
nekrikštas/395	5
neracionalumas/8	5
nerinkėjas/29	5
nerūkytojas/29	5
nešiotojas/29	5
nešėjas/29	5
niekšelis/69	5
paaukotojas/29	5
padaugintojas/29	5
pagarsėjimas/8	5
pagerėjimas/8	5
Pagėgiai/122	7
pasirėdymas/8	18
pateikiamumas/8	5
patronas/8	5
patvirtinimas/8	5
pašaudymas/8	5
pašlemėkas/395	5
penketukas/36	5
Peršokšnai/11	7
Petkūnai/11	7
planas/8	5
Plytnikas/7	6
prisiplakėlis/45	5
Pukis/12	6
pulkelis/69	5
Radžiūnai/11	7
Raistežeris/18	7
raukinukai/324	5
Ruikas/7	6
rusinai/33	5
rėmėjas/29	5
rėžėjas/29	5
sakytojas/29	5
salijai/50	5
Seinai/122	7
sikai/33	5
skambintojas/29	5
skambinėtojas/29	5
sportinukai/324	5
staugūnas/8	5
Steponukas/60	4
sušelpimas/8	5
sužinojimas/8	5
svirnelis/69	5
tetėnas/8	5
tiekimas/8	5
triacilglicerolis/45	5
Triušiai/11	7
Truikinai/11	7
urologas/8	5
užvadas/395	5
valonai/33	5
varinėjimas/8	5
velnias/515	5
verkėjas/29	5
verkšlentojas/29	5
Veršiai/11	7
vienetukas/36	5
vienytojas/29	5
viliotojas/29	5
Vygirdas/1	4
vėjas/391	5
Štalis/12	6
Štombergis/12	6
Žvalionis/12	6
įlaipintojas/29	5
šaltukas/36	5
šnopštimas/26	5
šumerai/33	5
